California, session 20252026, AB2213.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 4 (commencing with Section 104670) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: Article 4. California Healthy Food Financing Initiative104670. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative.104671. For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Council” means the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative Council created pursuant to Section 104672.(b) “Fund” means the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative Fund established pursuant to Section 104674.(c) “Initiative” means the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative.104672. (a) There is hereby created in the office of the Treasurer the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative Council, within the office of the Treasurer, which shall comprise be composed of all of the following members:(1) The Treasurer Treasurer, or their designee. designee, who shall chair the council.(2) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture or their designee.(3) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services Director of Social Services or their designee.(4) The Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development or their designee.(b)(1)The council shall be chaired by the Treasurer or their designee.(2)(b) The council shall implement the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative to expand access to nutritious foods in underserved, urban, suburban, tribal, and rural communities communities, to support programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems, and to eliminate food deserts and hunger in California.(c) The To implement the initiative, the council shall do all of the following:(1) Develop financing options, using public, philanthropic, or private moneys and other resources, to support access to healthy foods foods, and to support programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems, for all Californians.(2) Develop parameters for the initiative, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Defining Define eligible entities for participation.(B) Developing Develop minimum eligibility thresholds for participation.(C) Establishing Establish minimum and maximum levels of financial assistance.(D) Identifying Identify and prioritizing prioritize areas of the state for implementation of the initiative.(E) Develop criteria for identifying and prioritizing communities with the greatest food access needs.(F) Identify food assistance, nutrition incentive, and food access programs eligible for participation.(G) Establish funding schedules and procedures for awarding grants from the fund to eligible entities and food assistance, nutrition incentive, and food access programs.(3) Partner with federal, state, or local government agencies, nonprofit organizations, philanthropic entities, or other stakeholders to further the purposes of the initiative.(4) Review the recommendations described in prepared and strategies developed pursuant to Section 104673.(5) Provide updates to the Legislature as requested.(6) Prioritize financing to food assistance, nutrition incentive, and food access programs.(7) Prioritize financing to eligible entities, defined pursuant to paragraph (2), based on, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Projects located in underserved communities with limited access to full-service grocery stores or healthy food retailers.(B) Small and independent grocers, food cooperatives, and community-owned food retail projects.(C) Projects serving a population area currently not being served by a food assistance, nutrition incentive, or food access program.(D) The degree of the existence of demographic conditions and the character of the communities in which sales of California-grown fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables are made to the public by authorized vendors operating in conjunction with a qualified entity, including all of the following:(i) The number of people who are eligible for, or are receiving, food assistance, nutrition incentive, and food access programs.(ii) The prevalence of diabetes, obesity, and other diet-related illnesses.(iii) The availability of access to fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables.(d) The council shall adopt any rules or regulations necessary to implement the initiative.(e) The council shall establish, maintain, and periodically update an internet website. The council’s internet website shall, on or before March 31, 2027, shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(1) On or before March 31, 2027, all of the following information:(1)(A) Actions taken by the council.(2)(B) Funding sources that are available to support access to healthy foods, foods and to support programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems, including loans and grants from public, private, or philanthropic sources, and how to obtain these sources of funding.(3)(C) Interagency activities among the Treasurer, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the California Health and Human Services Agency, State Department of Social Services, and the Labor and Workforce Development Agency that focus on benefiting underserved communities and communities, increasing access to healthy foods. foods, and supporting programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems.(4)(D) Resources and hyperlinks to other internet websites with information on food deserts and deserts, increasing access to healthy foods. foods, and programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems.(2) On or before January 1, 2028, all of the following information:(A) The total amount of funds in the fund, including the total amount of funds received from each funding source.(B) The total amount of funds expended to leverage other funding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 104674, including the amount of funds expended from each funding source and the total amount of funds generated from those investments.(C) The total amount of funds disbursed from the fund, including the entities and programs that received funding and the total amount of funds each eligible entity and program received.(D) The geographic location of the projects that received funds from the fund.104673. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Secretary of Food and Agriculture Agriculture, in coordination with the Director of Social Services, shall prepare recommendations, to be presented upon request of the Legislature, regarding actions that need to be taken to promote food access and develop strategies to align healthy food financing projects with food assistance programs to improve food affordability and food availability among underserved communities in the state.(b) (1) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture Agriculture, in coordination with the Director of Social Services, may establish an advisory group, not to exceed 21 members, to assist the secretary in complying with the requirement of subdivision (a). If established, the advisory group(2) An advisory group established pursuant to this subdivision shall consist of representatives from the Legislature, food policy advocates, representatives from the grocery industry, farmer’s farmers markets, food cooperatives, food hubs, and financial institutions, food systems researchers, representatives from the agricultural industry, representatives from underserved communities, representatives from nonprofit and philanthropic organizations with expertise in this area, representatives of health care providers, representatives from a human services agency with experience administering food assistance programs, representatives from a food and agricultural agency who have experience administering food assistance programs, and others.104674. (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative Fund, which shall consist of federal, state, philanthropic, and private funds, for the purpose of expanding access to healthy foods in underserved communities. communities and to support programs that connect agricultural products to food assistance systems.(b) Moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, and to the extent practicable, to leverage other funding, including, but not limited to, new market tax credits, the California Organized Investment Network program established pursuant to Article 10.1 (commencing with Section 926) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, federal and foundation grant programs, incentives available to federally designated opportunity zones, the federal Specialty Crop Block Grant Program, and funding from community development corporations and private sector financial institutions pursuant to the federal Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2901 et seq.).